Utah statutes.
32A-4a-301.   Commission's power to grant resort spa sublicense --
Limitations.
(1)  Before a resort spa may sell or allow the consumption of an alcoholic
beverage on the resort spa sublicense premises, a resort licensee or an
applicant for a resort license shall first obtain a resort spa sublicense from
the commission as provided in this part.
(2)  The commission may grant a resort spa sublicense for the purpose of
establishing a resort spa outlet within the boundary of a resort building for
the storage, sale, and consumption of liquor on premises operated as a resort
spa.
(3)  The resort spa sublicense premises must fall entirely within the boundary
of a resort building.
